North Carolina, session 2025, SB591.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-362 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-362. Cockfighting.
(a) A person who instigates, promotes, conducts, is employed at, allows property under
his ownership or control to be used for, participates as a spectator at, causes or allows a minor
under 18 years of age to be present at, or profits from from, an exhibition featuring the fighting
of a cock is guilty of a Class I H felony. A lease of property that is used or is intended to be used
for an exhibition featuring the fighting of a cock is void, and a lessor who knows this use is made
or is intended to be made of his property is under a duty to evict the lessee immediately.
(b) A person who knowingly owns, possesses, trains, buys, sells, offers to buy or sell, or
transports a cock to be used in an exhibition featuring the fighting of that cock with another cock
or another animal is guilty of a Class H felony."
SECTION 2. G.S. 14-362.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-362.2. Dog fighting and baiting.
(a) A person who instigates, promotes, conducts, is employed at, provides a dog for,
causes or allows a minor under 18 years of age to be present at, allows property under the person's
ownership or control to be used for, gambles on, or profits from an exhibition featuring the baiting
of a dog or the fighting of a dog with another dog or with another animal is guilty of a Class H
felony. A lease of property that is used or is intended to be used for an exhibition featuring the
baiting of a dog or the fighting of a dog with another dog or with another animal is void, and a
lessor who knows this use is made or is intended to be made of the lessor's property is under a
duty to evict the lessee immediately.
(b) A person who knowingly owns, possesses, or trains trains, buys, sells, offers to buy
or sell, or transports a dog with the intent that the dog to be used in an exhibition featuring the
baiting of that dog or the fighting of that dog with another dog or with another animal is guilty
of a Class H felony.
…."
SECTION 3. Article 47 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 14-362.2A. Animal fighting paraphernalia.
*S591-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) For purposes of this section, the term "animal fighting paraphernalia" means
equipment, products, implements, and materials of any kind that are used, intended for use, or
designed for use in the training, preparation, conditioning, or furtherance of animal fighting, and
includes, but is not limited to, the following: breaking sticks, cat mills, fighting pits, springpoles,
or gaffs, slashers, heels, or any other sharp implement designed to be attached in place of the
natural spur of a cock or game fowl. In determining whether an object is animal fighting
paraphernalia under this section, the court shall consider all of the following:
(1) Any prior convictions under federal or state law relating to animal fighting.
(2) The proximity of the object in time and space to the direct violation of this
G.S. 14-362, 14-362.1, or 14-362.2.
(3) Direct or circumstantial evidence of the intent of the accused to deliver the
object to persons whom he or she knows or should reasonably know intend to
use the object to facilitate a violation of G.S. 14-362, 14-362.1, or 14-362.2.
(4) Oral or written instructions provided with or in the vicinity of the object
concerning its use.
(5) Descriptive materials accompanying the object which explain or depict its use.
(6) Any other logically relevant factors.
(b) A person who possesses, buys, sells, or manufactures animal fighting paraphernalia
with the intent to promote, engage in, or facilitate a violation of G.S. 14-362, 14-362.1, or
14-362.2, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the training of animals or the use
of equipment in the training of animals for any purpose not prohibited by law."
SECTION 4. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.
SECTION 5. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 591-First Edition